Vermont statutes. Title 9 Commerce and Trade
Subchapter 1. General Provisions
§ 2464a.
Prohibited telephone solicitations.

Definitions. As used in this section, section 2464b, and section 2464c of this title:

“Customer” means a customer, residing or located in Vermont, of a company providing telecommunications service as defined in

30 V.S.A. § 203(5)

.

“Caller identification information” means information a caller identification service provides regarding the name and number of the person calling.

“Caller identification service” means a service that allows a subscriber of the service to have the telephone number and, where available, the name of the calling party transmitted contemporaneously with the telephone call and displayed on a device in or connected to the subscriber’s telephone.

“Federal functional regulator” means a federal functional regulator as defined in 15 U.S.C. § 6809(2).

“Financial institution” means a financial institution as defined in 15 U.S.C. § 6809(3).

“Tax-exempt organization” means an organization described in Section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Service Code (

26 U.S.C. § 501(c))

.

“Telemarketer” means any telephone solicitor. However, “telemarketer” does not include any telephone solicitor who is otherwise registered or licensed with, or regulated or chartered by, the Secretary of State, the Public Utility Commission, the Department of Financial Regulation, or the Department of Taxes or is a financial institution subject to regulations adopted pursuant to

15 U.S.C. § 6804(a)

by a federal functional regulator. Telephone solicitors registered with the Department of Taxes to collect Vermont income withholding, sales and use, or meals and rooms tax, but not registered with any other agency listed in this subdivision, shall provide to the Secretary of State an address and agent for the purpose of submitting to the jurisdiction of the Vermont courts in any action brought for violations of this section.

“Telephone solicitation”:

means the solicitation by telephone of a customer for the purpose of encouraging the customer to contribute to an organization that is not a tax-exempt organization, or to purchase, lease, or otherwise agree to pay consideration for money, goods, or services; and

does not include:

telephone calls made in response to a request or inquiry by the called customer;

telephone calls made by or on behalf of a tax-exempt organization, an organization incorporated as a nonprofit organization with the State of Vermont, or an organization in the process of applying for tax-exempt status or nonprofit status;

telephone calls made by a person not regularly engaged in the activities listed in subdivision (A) of this subdivision (8); or

telephone calls made to a person with whom the telephone solicitor has an established business relationship.

“Telephone solicitor” means any person placing telephone solicitations, or hiring others, on an hourly, commission, or independent contractor basis to conduct telephone solicitations.

Prohibition; Caller Identification Information.

No telemarketer shall make a telephone solicitation to a telephone number in Vermont without having first registered in accordance with section 2464b of this title.

No person shall make any telephone call to a telephone number in Vermont that violates the Federal Trade Commission’s Do Not Call Rule, 16 C.F.R. subdivision 310.4(b)(1)(iii), or the Federal Communication Commission’s Do Not Call Rule, 47 C.F.R. subdivision 64.1200(c)(2) and subsection (d), as amended from time to time.

A person who places a telephone call to make a telephone solicitation or to induce a charitable contribution, donation, or gift of money or other thing of value shall transmit or cause to be transmitted to a caller identification service in use by the recipient of the call:
(3) (A) A person who places a telephone call to make a telephone solicitation or to induce a charitable contribution, donation, or gift of money or other thing of value shall transmit or cause to be transmitted to a caller identification service in use by the recipient of the call:

Notwithstanding subdivision (A) of this subdivision (3), a caller may substitute for its own name and number the name and the number, which is answered during regular business hours, of the person on whose behalf the caller places the call.

(i)

the caller’s telephone number; and

(ii)

if made available by the caller’s carrier, the caller’s name.

Violation. A violation of this section shall constitute a violation of section 2453 of this title. Each prohibited telephone call shall constitute a separate violation. In considering a civil penalty for violations of subdivision (b)(2) of this section, the court may consider, among other relevant factors, the extent to which a telephone solicitor maintained and complied with procedures designed to ensure compliance with the rules of the Federal Communications Commission and the Federal Trade Commission.

Criminal Penalties. A telemarketer who makes a telephone solicitation in violation of subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall be imprisoned for not more than 18 months or fined not more than $10,000.00, or both. It shall be an affirmative defense, for a telemarketer with five or fewer employees, that the telemarketer did not know and did not consciously avoid knowing that Vermont has a requirement of registration of telemarketers. Each telephone call shall constitute a separate solicitation under this section. This section shall not be construed to limit a person’s liability under any other civil or criminal law.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 120

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2003, No. 89

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 7, 2004;

2017, No. 66

, § 1, eff. June 8, 2017.

§ 2464b.
Registration of telemarketers.

Every telemarketer shall register with the Secretary of State, on a form approved by the Secretary. In the case of a telemarketer who hires, whether on an hourly, commission, or independent contractor basis, one or more persons to conduct telephone solicitations, only the person who causes others to conduct telephone solicitations need register. The Secretary of State may adopt rules prescribing the manner in which registration under this section shall be conducted, including a requirement of notice to the Secretary by the telemarketer when the telemarketer ceases to do business in Vermont.

The Secretary of State shall require that each telemarketer designate an agent for the purpose of submitting to the jurisdiction of the Vermont courts in any action brought for violations of section 2464a of this title.

The Secretary of State shall collect the following fees when a document described in this section is delivered to the Office of the Secretary of State for filing:

Registration: $125.00.

Statement of change of designated agent or designated office, or both: $25.00, not to exceed $1,000.00 per filer per calendar year.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 120

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

2013, No. 72

, § 2.

§ 2464c.
Private cause of action.

Any person who receives a telephone call in violation of subsection 2464a(b) of this title may bring an action in Superior Court for damages, injunctive relief, punitive damages in the case of a willful violation, and reasonable costs and attorney’s fees. The court may issue an award for the person’s actual damages or $500.00 for a first violation, or $1,000.00 for each subsequent violation, whichever is greater. In considering the amount of punitive damages, the court may consider, among other relevant factors, the extent to which a telephone solicitor maintained and complied with procedures designed to ensure compliance with the requirements of sections 2464a and 2464b of this title. This section shall not limit any other claims the person may have under applicable law.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 120

(Adj. Sess.), § 3; amended

2003, No. 89

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 7, 2004;

2017, No. 66

, § 1, eff. June 8, 2017.

§ 2464d.
Telephone preference service.

Local exchange carriers shall provide notices at least annually to residential customers of the availability of telephone callers’ do not call lists under federal law and of the federal Do Not Call Registry, and a description of how to register.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 120

(Adj. Sess.), § 4; amended

2003, No. 89

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 7, 2004.

§ 2465.
Antitrust remedies.

Any person who sustains damages or injury as a result of any violation of State antitrust laws, including section 2453 of this title, may sue and recover from the violator the amount of his or her damages, or the consideration or the value of the consideration given by the aggrieved person, reasonable attorney’s fees, and exemplary damages, not exceeding three times the value of the consideration given or damages sustained by the aggrieved person.

In any action for damages or injury sustained as a result of any violation of State antitrust laws, pursuant to section 2453 of this title, the fact that the State, any public agency, political subdivision, or any other person has not dealt directly with a defendant shall not bar or otherwise limit recovery. The court shall take all necessary steps to avoid duplicate liability, including the transfer or consolidation of all related actions.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 65

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§ 2465a.
Definition of local, local to Vermont, and locally grown or made in Vermont.

As used in this section:

“Eggs” means eggs that are the product of laying birds, including chickens, turkeys, ducks, geese, or quail, and that are in the shell.

“Majority of ingredients” means more than 50 percent of all product ingredients by volume, excluding water.

“Processed food” means any food other than a raw agricultural product and includes a raw agricultural product that has been subject to processing, such as canning, cooking, dehydrating, milling, or the addition of other ingredients. Processed food includes dairy, meat, maple products, beverages, fruit, or vegetables that have been subject to processing, baked, or modified into a value-added or unique food product.

“Raw agricultural product” means any food in its raw or natural state without added ingredients, including pasteurized or homogenized milk, maple sap or syrup, honey, meat, eggs, apple cider, and fruits or vegetables that may be washed, colored, or otherwise treated in their unpeeled natural form prior to marketing.

“Substantial period of its life” means an animal that was harvested in Vermont and lived in Vermont for at least one third of its life or one year.

“Unique food product” means food processed in Vermont from ingredients that are not regularly produced in Vermont or not available in sufficient quantities to meet production requirements.

For the purposes of this chapter and rules adopted pursuant to subsection 2453(c) of this chapter, “local,” “local to Vermont,” “locally grown or made in Vermont,” and any substantially similar term shall have the following meaning based on the type of food or food product:

For products that are raw agricultural products, “local to Vermont” means the product:

was exclusively grown or tapped in Vermont;

is not milk and was derived from an animal that was raised for a substantial period of its lifetime in Vermont;

is milk where a majority of the milk was produced from Vermont animals; or

is honey produced by Vermont colonies located exclusively in Vermont when all nectar was collected.

Except as provided in subdivision (3) of this subsection, for products that are processed foods, “local to Vermont” means:

the majority of the ingredients are raw agricultural products that are local to Vermont; and

the product meets one or both or the following criteria:

the product was processed in Vermont; or

the headquarters of the company that manufactures the product is located in Vermont.

For bakery products, beverages, or unique food products, the product meets two or more of the following criteria:

the majority of the ingredients are raw agricultural products that are local to Vermont;

substantial transformation of the ingredients in the product occurred in Vermont; or

the headquarters of the company that manufactures the product is located in Vermont.

For the purposes of this chapter and rules adopted pursuant to subsection 2453(c) of this chapter, when referring to products other than food, “local” and any substantially similar term shall mean that the goods being advertised originated within Vermont.

For the purposes of this chapter and rules adopted under subsection 2453(c) of this title, “local,” “locally grown or made,” and substantially similar terms may be used in conjunction with a specific geographic location provided that the specific geographic location appears as prominently as the term “local” and the representation of origin is accurate. If a local representation refers to a specific city or town, the product shall have been grown or made in that city or town. If a local representation refers to a region with precisely defined political boundaries, the product shall have been grown or made within those boundaries. If a local representation refers to a region that is not precisely defined by political boundaries, then the region shall be prominently described when the representation is made, or the product shall have been grown or made within 30 miles of the point of sale, measured directly point to point.

A person or company who sells or markets food or goods impacted by a change in this section shall have until January 1, 2021 to utilize existing product labels or packaging materials and to come into compliance with the requirements of this section.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 207

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. June 11, 2008; amended

2019, No. 129

(Adj. Sess.), § 17.

§ 2465b.
Misrepresentation of a floral business as local.

In connection with the sale of floral products, it shall be an unlawful and deceptive act and practice in commerce in violation of section 2453 of this title for a floral business to misrepresent in an advertisement, on the Internet, on a website, or in a listing of the floral business in a telephone directory or other directory assistance database the geographic location of the floral business as “local,” “locally owned,” or physically located within Vermont.

A floral business is considered to misrepresent its geographic location that it is “local,” “locally owned,” or located within Vermont in violation of subsection (a) of this section if the floral business is not physically located in Vermont and:

the advertisement, Internet, website, or directory listing would lead a reasonable consumer to conclude that the floral business is physically located in Vermont; or

the advertisement, Internet, website, or directory listing uses the name of a floral business that is physically located in Vermont, with geographic terms that would lead a reasonable consumer to understand the advertised floral business to be physically located in Vermont.

A retail floral business physically located in Vermont shall be deemed a consumer for the purposes of enforcing this section under subsection 2461(b) of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 52

, § 45, eff. May 27, 2011.

§ 2466.
Goods and services appearing on telephone bill.

Except as provided in subsection (f) of this section, a seller shall not bill a consumer for goods or services that will appear as a charge on the person’s bill for telephone service provided by any local exchange carrier.

No person shall arrange on behalf of a seller of goods or services, directly or through an intermediary, with a local exchange carrier, to bill a consumer for goods or services other than as permitted by this section. This prohibition applies, but is not limited, to persons who aggregate consumer billings for a seller and to persons who serve as a clearinghouse for aggregated billings.

Failure to comply with this section is an unfair and deceptive act and practice in commerce under this chapter.

The Attorney General may make rules and regulations to carry out the purposes of this section.

Nothing in this section limits the liability of any person under existing statutory or common law.

This section shall apply to billing aggregators described in

30 V.S.A. § 231a

, but shall not apply to:
(f) (1) This section shall apply to billing aggregators described in

30 V.S.A. § 231a

, but shall not apply to:

billing for goods or services marketed or sold by persons subject to the jurisdiction of the Vermont Public Utility Commission under

30 V.S.A. § 203

;

billing for direct dial or dial around services initiated from the consumer’s telephone; or

operator-assisted telephone calls, collect calls, or telephone services provided to facilitate communication to or from correctional center inmates.

Nothing in this section affects any rule issued by the Vermont Public Utility Commission.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 67

(Adj. Sess.), § 5; amended

2011, No. 52

, § 78, eff. May 27, 2011.

§ 2466a.
Consumer protections; prescription drugs.

A violation of

18 V.S.A. § 4631

shall be considered a prohibited practice under section 2453 of this title.

As provided in

18 V.S.A. § 9474

, a violation of

18 V.S.A. § 9472

or 9473 shall be considered a prohibited practice under section 2453 of this title.

It shall be a prohibited practice under section 2453 of this title for a manufacturer of prescription drugs to present or cause to be presented in the State a regulated advertisement if that advertisement does not comply with the requirements concerning drugs and devices and prescription drug advertising in federal law and regulations under 21 U.S.C. §§ 331 and 352(n) and 21 C.F.R. Part 202.
(c) (1) It shall be a prohibited practice under section 2453 of this title for a manufacturer of prescription drugs to present or cause to be presented in the State a regulated advertisement if that advertisement does not comply with the requirements concerning drugs and devices and prescription drug advertising in federal law and regulations under 21 U.S.C. §§ 331 and 352(n) and 21 C.F.R. Part 202.

For purposes of this section:

“Manufacturer of prescription drugs” means a person authorized by law to manufacture, bottle, or pack drugs or biological products; a licensee or affiliate of that person; or a labeler that receives drugs or biological products from a manufacturer or wholesaler and repackages them for later retail sale and has a labeler code from the federal Food and Drug Administration under 21 C.F.R. § 202.20.

“Regulated advertisement” means:

the presentation to the general public of a commercial message regarding a prescription drug or biological product by a manufacturer of prescription drugs that is broadcast on television, cable, or radio from a station or cable company that is physically located in the State, broadcast over the Internet from a location in the State, or printed in magazines or newspapers that are printed, distributed, or sold in the State; or

a commercial message regarding a prescription drug or biological product by a manufacturer of prescription drugs or its representative that is conveyed:

to the office of a health care professional doing business in Vermont, including statements by representatives or employees of the manufacturer and materials mailed or delivered to the office; or

at a conference or other professional meeting occurring in Vermont.

No person shall sell, offer for sale, or distribute electronic prescribing software that advertises, uses instant messaging and pop-up advertisements, or uses other means to influence or attempt to influence the prescribing decision of a health care professional through economic incentives or otherwise and that is triggered or in specific response to the input, selection, or act of a health care professional or agent in prescribing a specific prescription drug or directing a patient to a certain pharmacy. This subsection shall not apply to information provided to the health care professional about pharmacy reimbursement, prescription drug formulary compliance, and patient care management.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 80

, § 21; amended

2007, No. 89

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. March 5, 2008;

2013, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 15;

2015, No. 23

, § 42.

§ 2466b.
Disclosure of fee for automatic dialing service.

In this section:

“Automatic dialing service” means a service of a home or business security, monitoring, alarm, or similar system, by which the system automatically initiates a call or connection to an emergency service provider, either directly or through a third person, upon the occurrence of an action specified within the system to initiate a call or connection.

“Emergency functions” include services provided by the Department of Public Safety, firefighting services, police services, sheriff’s department services, medical and health services, rescue, engineering, emergency warning services, communications, evacuation of persons, emergency welfare services, protection of critical infrastructure, emergency transportation, temporary restoration of public utility services, other functions related to civilian protection, and all other activities necessary or incidental to the preparation for and carrying out of these functions.

“Emergency service provider” means a person that performs emergency functions.

Before executing a contract for the sale or lease of a security, monitoring, alarm, or similar system that includes an automatic dialing service, the seller or lessor of the system shall disclose in writing:

any fee or charge the seller or lessor charges to the buyer or lessee for the service; and

that the buyer or lessor may be subject to additional fees or charges imposed by another person for use of the service.

A person who fails to provide the disclosure required by subsection (b) of this section commits an unfair and deceptive act in commerce in violation of section 2453 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 55

, § 4.

§ 2466c.
Internet service; network management; Attorney General review and disclosure.

The Attorney General shall review the network management practices of Internet service providers in Vermont and, to the extent possible, make a determination as to whether the provider’s broadband Internet access service complies with the open Internet rules contained in the Federal Communications Commission’s 2015 Open Internet Order, “Protecting and Promoting the Open Internet,” WC Docket No. 14-28, Report and Order on Remand, Declaratory Ruling and Order, 30 FCC Rcd 5601.

The Attorney General shall disclose his or her findings under this section on a publicly available, easily accessible website maintained by his or her office.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 169

(Adj. Sess.), § 8.